Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.80.060

Voluntary donations for purpose of supporting hunger programs.

(1) Code cities providing utility services under this chapter may request voluntary donations from their customers for the purpose of supporting hunger programs.

(2) Voluntary donations collected by code cities under this section must be used by the code city to support the maintenance and operation of hunger programs.

(3) Donations received under this section do not contribute to the gross income of a light and power business or gas distribution business under chapter 82.16 RCW.

(4) Nothing in this section precludes a code city providing utility services from requesting voluntary donations to support other programs.

[ 2011 c 226 s 3.]